Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  30.265 to
30.300.
SECTION 2. (1) The Psychiatric Security Review Board is immune  from liability for any
claim for injury to or death of any person or injury to property  resulting from an act or
omission of the board with respect to the following functions:
(a) Conducting hearings as required by law to determine the appropriate status, release
or commitment of persons under the jurisdiction of the board.
(b) Conducting hearings as required by law to determine whether to classify or reclassify
a sex offender or whether to relieve a person from the obligation to report as a  sex offender.
(c) Conducting hearings as required by law to determine whether to restore a  person’s
right to possess firearms.
(d) Conducting assessments as required by law to classify sex offenders.
(e) Making  decisions as required by law pertaining to the oversight and supervision of
persons placed on conditional release in the community.
(f) Making decisions as required  by law pertaining to the modification and termination
of conditional release plans.
(g) Making decisions as required by law pertaining to whether a person should be certi-
fied for another period of commitment.
(2) Except when the board has committed willful  or wanton misconduct, the board is
immune from liability for any claim  for injury to or death of any person or injury to property
resulting from an act or omission of a person who is or  was under the jurisdiction of the
board while the person is on conditional release or  discharged from the jurisdiction of the
board.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as  provided in subsection (2) of this section, section 2 of this 2025
Act applies to all causes of  action, whether arising before, on or after the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) Section 2 of  this 2025 Act does not apply to causes of action for which a final
judgment has been entered before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(b) As used in this subsection, “final judgment” means a judgment  for which the time to
appeal has expired without any party filing  an appeal or that is not subject to further appeal
or review.
Enrolled House Bill 2807 (HB 2807-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House March 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2807 (HB 2807-INTRO) Page 2